src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/Dem-am_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Demonstrative - am - ok :
     am+Dem+A+Sg: ama
     am+Dem+I+Sg: ami
     am+Dem+A+Obv: ami
     am+Dem+A+Pl: amiksi
     am+Dem+I+Pl: amistsi
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+Stat: amama
     am+Dem+I+Sg+Stat: amima
     am+Dem+A+Obv+Stat: amima
     am+Dem+A+Pl+Stat: amiksima
     am+Dem+I+Pl+Stat: amistsima
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+Movg: amaya
     am+Dem+I+Sg+Movg: amiya
     am+Dem+A+Obv+Movg: amiya
     am+Dem+A+Pl+Movg: amiksiya
     am+Dem+I+Pl+Movg: amistsiya
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+Invs: amahka
     am+Dem+I+Sg+Invs: amihka
     am+Dem+A+Obv+Invs: amihka
     am+Dem+A+Pl+Invs: amiksska
     am+Dem+I+Pl+Invs: amistsska
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+MT: amaka
     am+Dem+I+Sg+MT: amika
     am+Dem+A+Obv+MT: amika
     am+Dem+A+Pl+MT: amiksika
     am+Dem+I+Pl+MT: amistsika
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+Vblz:  [amao'ka,    amaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Sg+Vblz:  [amio'ka,     amiayi]
     am+Dem+A+Obv+Vblz: [amio'ka,     amiayi]
     am+Dem+A+Pl+Vblz:  [amikso'ka,  amiksayi]
     am+Dem+I+Pl+Vblz:  [amistso'ka, amistsayi]
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+Stat+Vblz:  [amamao'ka,     amamaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Sg+Stat+Vblz:  [amimao'ka,     amimaayi]
     am+Dem+A+Obv+Stat+Vblz: [amimao'ka,     amimaayi]
     am+Dem+A+Pl+Stat+Vblz:  [amiksimao'ka,  amiksimaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Pl+Stat+Vblz:  [amistsimao'ka, amistsimaayi]
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+Movg+Vblz:  [amayao'ka,     amayaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Sg+Movg+Vblz:  [amiyao'ka,     amiyaayi]
     am+Dem+A+Obv+Movg+Vblz: [amiyao'ka,     amiyaayi]
     am+Dem+A+Pl+Movg+Vblz:  [amiksiyao'ka,  amiksiyaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Pl+Movg+Vblz:  [amistsiyao'ka, amistsiyaayi]
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+Invs+Vblz:  [amahkao'ka,    amahkaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Sg+Invs+Vblz:  [amihkao'ka,    amihkaayi]
     am+Dem+A+Obv+Invs+Vblz: [amihkao'ka,    amihkaayi]
     am+Dem+A+Pl+Invs+Vblz:  [amiksskao'ka,  amiksskaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Pl+Invs+Vblz:  [amistsskao'ka, amistsskaayi]
     
     am+Dem+A+Sg+MT+Vblz:  [amakao'ka,     amakaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Sg+MT+Vblz:  [amikao'ka,     amikaayi]
     am+Dem+A+Obv+MT+Vblz: [amikao'ka,     amikaayi]
     am+Dem+A+Pl+MT+Vblz:  [amiksikao'ka,  amiksikaayi]
     am+Dem+I+Pl+MT+Vblz:  [amistsikao'ka, amistsikaayi]
     
